Mississippi, session 2026, SB2633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-61-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-61-3.  The following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Public body" shall mean any department, bureau, division, council, commission, committee, subcommittee, board, agency and any other entity of the state or a political subdivision thereof, and any municipal corporation and any other entity created by the Constitution or by law, executive order, ordinance or resolution.  The term "public body" includes the governing board of a charter school authorized by the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board. Within the meaning of this chapter, the term "entity" shall not be construed to include individuals employed by a public body or any appointed or elected public official. (b)  "Public records" shall mean all books, records, papers, accounts, letters, maps, photographs, films, cards, tapes, recordings or reproductions thereof, and any other documentary materials, regardless of physical form or characteristics, having been used, being in use, or prepared, possessed or retained for use in the conduct, transaction or performance of any business, transaction, work, duty or function of any public body, or required to be maintained by any public body.  "Public records" shall not mean "personal information" as defined in Section 25-62-1. (c)  "Data processing software" means the programs and routines used to employ and control the capabilities of data processing hardware, including, but not limited to, operating systems, compilers, assemblers, utilities, library routines, maintenance routines, applications and computer networking programs. (d)  "Proprietary software" means data processing software that is obtained under a licensing agreement and is protected by copyright or trade secret laws. (e)  "Incident report" means a narrative description, if such narrative description exists and if such narrative description does not contain investigative information, of an alleged offense, and at a minimum shall include the name and identification of each person charged with and arrested for the alleged offense, the time, date and location of the alleged offense, and the property involved, to the extent this information is known. (f) "Investigative report" means records of a law enforcement agency containing information beyond the scope of the matters contained in an incident report, and generally will include, but not be limited to, the following matters if beyond the scope of the matters contained in an incident report: (i)  Records that are compiled in the process of detecting and investigating any unlawful activity or alleged unlawful activity, the disclosure of which would harm the investigation which may include crime scene reports and demonstrative evidence; (ii)  Records that would reveal the identity of informants and/or witnesses; (iii)  Records that would prematurely release information that would impede the public body's enforcement, investigative or detection efforts; (iv)  Records that would disclose investigatory techniques and/or results of investigative techniques; (v)  Records that would deprive a person of a right to a fair trial or an impartial adjudication; (vi)  Records that would endanger the life or safety of a public official or law enforcement personnel, or confidential informants or witnesses; (vii)  Records pertaining to quality control or PEER review activities; or (viii)  Records that would impede or jeopardize a prosecutor's ability to prosecute the alleged offense. (g)  "Law enforcement agency" means a public body that performs as one (1) of its principal functions activities pertaining to the enforcement of criminal laws, the apprehension and investigation of criminal offenders, or the investigation of criminal activities. (h)  "Personally Identifiable Information (PII)" means information that can be used to distinguish or trace an individual's identity, either alone or when combined with other personal or identifying information that is linked or linkable to a specific individual.  The definition of PII is not anchored to any single category of information or technology.  Rather, it requires a case-by-case assessment of the specific risk that an individual can be identified.  Non-PII can become PII whenever additional information is made publicly available, in any medium and from any source, that when combined with other available information could be used to identify an individual. (i) "Protected Personally Identifiable Information (Protected PII)" means an individual's first name or first initial and last name in combination with any one or more of types of information, including, but not limited to: (i) Social Security numbers; (ii) Home addresses; (iii) Driver's license numbers; (iv)  Date and place of birth;                  (v)  Home or personal phone number;                  (vi)  Financial account numbers;                  (vii)  Personnel records and applications for employment;                  (viii)  Information that would disclose a person's individual tax return or status;                  (ix)  Applications for licensure in the possession of a public body;                  (x)  Passport number;                  (xi)  Mother's maiden name;                  (xii)  Criminal, medical and financial record;                  (xiii)  Educational transcripts.      SECTION 2.  Section 25-61-12, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-61-12.  (1)  The home address, any telephone number of a privately paid account or other private information of any law enforcement officer, criminal investigator, judge or district attorney, or the spouse or child of the law enforcement officer, criminal investigator, judge or district attorney, shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  This exemption does not apply to any court transcript or recording if given under oath and not otherwise excluded by law. (2)  (a)  When in the possession of a law enforcement agency, investigative reports shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter; however, a law enforcement agency, in its discretion, may choose to make public all or any part of any investigative report. (b)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent any and all public bodies from having among themselves a free flow of information for the purpose of achieving a coordinated and effective detection and investigation of unlawful activity. Where the confidentiality of records covered by this section is being determined in a private hearing before a judge under Section 25-61-13, the public body may redact or separate from the records the identity of confidential informants or the identity of the person or persons under investigation or other information other than the nature of the incident, time, date and location. (c)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt from public disclosure a law enforcement incident report.  An incident report shall be a public record.  A law enforcement agency may release information in addition to the information contained in the incident report. (d)  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the disclosure of information that would reveal the identity of the victim. (3)  Personal information of victims, including victim impact statements and letters of support on behalf of victims that are contained in records on file with the Mississippi Department of Corrections and State Parole Board, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. (4)  Records of a public hospital board relating to the purchase or sale of medical or other practices or other business operations, and the recruitment of physicians and other health care professionals, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. (5)  Protected Personally Identifiable Information and other Personally Identifiable Information, as defined in Section 25-61-3, shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.